Illinois, session 104th, SB1593.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $4,700,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the Department of Public Health to be used to 7pay costs and administrative expenses associated with the 8Healthy Illinois Survey. 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 102025.